New Jersey, session 222, S3462.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 1 of P.L.2018, c.167 (C.18A:35-4.34) is amended to read as follows: 1.  a.  The State Board of Education shall require that a school district incorporate financial literacy instruction in [each of the grades six through eight financial literacy instruction to pupils enrolled in those grades] an appropriate place in the curriculum of students enrolled in grades six through eight. b.  The State board shall require 1[that]1 a school district 1[provide]1 to 1provide1 each high school student a one semester course, or one trimester course, as appropriate, 1exclusively1 in financial literacy. c.  The purpose of the middle school and high school instruction shall be to provide [middle school] students with the basic financial literacy necessary for sound financial decision-making. The instruction shall meet the requirements established by the State board and shall: [a.] (1) be appropriate to, and reflect the age and comprehension of, the students enrolled in the particular grade level; and [b.] (2) include content on budgeting, savings, credit, debt, insurance, investment, behavioral economics, banking, consumer skills, taxes, college financial planning, accounting, and other issues associated with personal financial responsibility as determined by the State board. Instruction that principally addresses economic, business, and entrepreneurial literacy shall not be used to satisfy the financial literacy instruction requirement established pursuant to this section. The instruction shall be taught by a teacher holding an appropriate endorsement. The Commissioner of Education shall provide school districts with sample instructional materials and resources that may be used to support the implementation of the financial literacy instruction requirement. (cf: P.L.2018, c.167, s.1) 2.  (New section) For a State-endorsed diploma, district boards of education shall develop, adopt, and implement local graduation requirements that include a requirement that a high school student  complete the financial literacy course provided pursuant to subsection b. of section 1 of P.L.2018, c.167 (C.18A:35-4.34). 3.  This act shall take effect immediately and section 2 shall first apply to students entering 12th grade in the 1[2027-2028] second full1 school year 1following the date of enactment1.